Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 8 Railroad Crossings

39-8-1.
Surfacing of highways crossed at grade.

Every railroad corporation whose roadbed crosses the public highway at grade shall cause the crossing to be covered with suitable material for highway travel so that the surface of the highway at the crossing shall not at any time be lower than three-fourths (3/4) of one inch (1") below the tops of the rails at the crossing; and every railroad that shall neglect or refuse to comply with the provisions of this section, after being notified by the city or town council of the city or town wherein the crossing is located, shall be fined not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 49; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 53; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 44; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 44; G.L. 1956, §

39-8-1

.

39-8-1.1.
Commission control of grade crossings.

In the exercise of the police power of the state for the safety of its inhabitants, the general assembly vests in the commission the authority and power to determine the point at which and the manner in which any grade crossing of a railroad and a street shall be constructed and the jurisdiction to determine whether any crossing should be altered, relocated, abolished, or eliminated, and the manner and conditions under which the crossings shall be maintained, even if the order of the commission has the effect of depriving a municipality of control of its streets.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 10.

39-8-1.2.
Definitions.

As used in this title:

“Private crossings” shall mean and refer to those crossings over railroad tracks at grade that have been established by written agreement between the railroad, the tracks of which are being crossed, and the party or parties who are given exclusive right of passage over the private crossing.

“Public crossings” shall mean and refer to those crossings of railroad tracks at grade that have been laid out or built with the consent of the commission expressed in writing as provided in §

39-8-3

, or have been designated as public crossings by order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 10.

39-8-1.3.
Authorization for private crossing.

No railroad owning railroad tracks within the state shall enter into any agreement of any nature whatsoever with any private party for the establishment of a private crossing at grade, unless and until the railroad shall have obtained permission from the commission for the establishment of the private crossing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 10; P.L. 1973, ch. 199, § 6.

39-8-1.4.
Barricading of crossings.

The general assembly hereby declares that any private railroad crossing found by the commission after a hearing to be dangerous or a hazard to the public or to those using trains is a public nuisance, and the commission may order the railroad to barricade the crossing as a matter of public safety.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 10.

39-8-2.
Raising or lowering of highway to eliminate grade crossing.

If the city or town council of any city or town where a turnpike or highway crossed by a railroad on a level therewith is situated, is of the opinion that it is necessary for the security of the public that the turnpike or highway should be raised or lowered, so as to pass over or under the railroad, it may request in writing that the corporation owning the railroad raise or lower the turnpike or highway. If the corporation neglects or refuses to do so, the city or town council may apply to the commission to decide upon the reasonableness of the request. If the commission, after due notice and hearing the parties, shall decide that the lowering or raising of grade is necessary for the security of the public, the corporation shall comply with the decision; provided, that either party shall have the right, in accordance with chapter 5 of this title, to petition the supreme court for relief, and the court shall have full power to finally decide the question as to the necessity of changing the grade. The cost and expense of making the change of grade shall be borne by the railroad corporation and the city or town asking for the change, in the proportion as may be decided by the court. If, after the decision of the court that a change of grade is necessary, or if, having taken no appeal from the decision of the commission, the corporation shall unreasonably neglect or refuse to change the grade, the city or town council may proceed to make the change, and may, in an action against the corporation, recover all charges and expenses occasioned by making the alterations.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 44; C.P.A. 1905, § 1226; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 48; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 39; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 39; G.L. 1956, §

39-8-2

; P.L. 1973, ch. 199, § 6; P.L. 1984, ch. 81, § 14; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 13.

39-8-3.
Consent to establishment of grade crossing.

No railroad corporation shall lay out or build its road or lay its tracks across any railroad, street, highway, turnpike, or traveled way at grade, and no street, highway, turnpike, or road shall be laid out or built across any railroad track at grade, except by the consent of the commission thereto; provided, that if the commission shall consent or refuse to consent to any crossing at grade, the corporation or any party aggrieved by the consent or refusal may petition the supreme court for relief in accordance with chapter 5 of this title, and the decision of the court shall be final.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 45; P.L. 1899, ch. 658, § 1; C.P.A. 1905, § 1226; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 49; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 40; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 40; G.L. 1956, §

39-8-3

; P.L. 1973, ch. 199, § 6; P.L. 1984, ch. 81, § 14.

39-8-4.
Obstruction of highway crossings.

No railroad corporation, nor its servants or agents, shall willfully or negligently obstruct or unnecessarily use or occupy a highway, city or town way, or street, nor in any case at a street or highway grade crossing, with cars or engines for more than five (5) minutes at one time; and whenever a highway, city or town way or street has been thus used or occupied with cars or engines, no railroad corporation shall again use or occupy the same with cars or engines until a sufficient time, not less than three (3) minutes, has been allowed for the passage across the railroad of such travelers as were ready and waiting to cross when the former occupation ceased. For every violation of the provisions of this section, the corporation shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 51; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 55; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 46; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 46; G.L. 1956, §

39-8-4

.

39-8-4.1.
Removal of debris from railroad rights-of-way, switching devices, and railroad yards.

A railroad corporation shall maintain and keep clear of debris in any railroad yard under its supervision or control that is used for storing railroad cars or locomotives, a distance of nine feet (9´) on either side of the center line of any track in any yard. Additionally, every railroad corporation shall maintain and keep clear of debris around any switch under its supervision or control, whether or not located in any such yard, a distance of nine feet (9´) on either side of the center line of any tracks wherein any switch is located, and a distance of nine feet (9´) in any direction from any switching device. The action shall not cause stoppage of through freight or passenger service. Additionally, every railroad corporation shall maintain and keep clear of debris from within the limits of any right-of-way owned by or under the control of the corporation.

For purposes of this section, “debris” means railroad material and equipment, including, but not limited to: brake shoes; air hoses; steel couplers; draw bars and knuckles; broken or fragmented components of railroad cars or locomotives; railroad ties or portions thereof; spilled cargo and their containers, as well as any garbage, discarded bottles, or other containers, wastepaper, or similar refuse that is present on any right-of-way or within the vicinity of any switching device or railroad yard in a quantity that can reasonably be expected to threaten life or health.

Upon the filing by a recognized railroad labor representative, as defined by the Railway Labor Act, 45 U.S.C. § 151 et seq., of a written verified complaint with the public utilities commission, on a form prescribed by the department, designating the nature of the debris and the particular area or location where any of the debris is or has existed for a period of at least seventy-two (72) hours, the public utilities commission shall, ten (10) days after notification to the superintendent of the division responsible for the yard or having jurisdiction over the complained-of area or switch, inspect the yard or switch area within seven (7) days, to ascertain the veracity of the complaint. If, after notice to the railroad corporation, and an opportunity for a hearing conducted in accordance with the provisions of this title, the public utilities commission determines the validity of the complaint, it shall issue orders within twenty-four (24) hours, to the superintendent of the division responsible for the yard or having jurisdiction over the complained-of area or switch listed in the complaint, directing the debris to be cleared within a reasonable period of time and in such manner as prescribed in the order. Failure to remove or clear the debris shall permit the public utilities commission to issue orders to the designated railroad official in charge of the yard or having jurisdiction over the complained-of area or switch to take the track or tracks or switch out of service until the orders have been complied with by the railroad corporation; provided the action shall not affect freight or passenger service, or in the alternative, assess a penalty not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day until the order is complied with.

Additionally, the public utilities commission, upon having reasonable cause to believe that a railroad corporation that owns or controls a right-of-way in this state is not complying with the provisions of subsection (a) of this section with respect to rights-of-way, shall conduct an investigation to determine whether a dangerous or unhealthy condition exists on an affected right-of-way. If the public utilities commission determines that a dangerous or unhealthy condition exists on an affected right-of-way, the commission shall send notice, by certified mail, to the local agent of the railroad corporation describing the condition and location of the right-of-way. The railroad company shall correct the condition not later than ten (10) days from the date the notice was mailed, otherwise the public utilities commission shall assess a penalty not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day until the condition is rectified.

The public utilities commission may adopt regulations in accordance with the provisions of this title to carry out the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 565, § 1.

39-8-5.
Railroads on highways subject to prescribed terms.

All railroads upon any street or highway in any town or city in this state shall be laid out, constructed, used, and continued therein under the terms and conditions named in §§

39-8-6

—

39-8-8

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 19; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

39-8-5

.

39-8-6.
Operation of grade crossings of railroads.

All railroads in this state crossing any other railroad at grade shall be operated at the crossing subject to, and in accordance with, such reasonable rules and regulations as the division of public utilities and carriers shall from time to time prescribe.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 16; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 11; G. L. 1938, ch. 124, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

39-8-6

.

39-8-7.
Town or city regulation of speed and manner of operation.

The town and city councils of the several towns and cities shall have power, from time to time, to make reasonable rules and regulations with reference to the rate of speed and mode of operation of railroads in the streets and highways of the respective towns and cities; the rules and regulations must receive the approval in writing of the division of public utilities and carriers.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

39-8-7

.

39-8-8.
Maintenance of highways occupied by rails.

Every corporation that maintains or uses railroad tracks in any street or highway in any town or city in this state, shall be liable to keep and maintain in good order and repair, including paving and repaving whenever and wherever necessary, that portion of any street or highway occupied by its railroad and eighteen inches (18") outside of any of its rails, in order that the streets and highways may be safe and convenient for travelers with their vehicles at all times, and the extent of the liability shall not be varied; provided, however, that the character of the paving, repaving, and repairing, shall be such as is from time to time fixed by the town or city councils of the respective towns and cities; and provided, further, that nothing in this section shall relieve any railroad corporation from the payment of any sum of money that it is now required by law to pay to any town or city for the use and occupancy of the streets and highways in the town or city.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 18; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

39-8-8

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 110.

39-8-9.
Order to maintain flagperson or precautionary appliance at grade crossing.

Every railroad corporation or lessees, receivers, or trustees of the corporation operating railroads within this state shall cause flagpersons or gates or other precautionary measures or appliances to be established or substituted wherever the railroads cross public highways, whenever and as often as in the opinion of the commission it is necessary for the safety of the public.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 47; P.L. 1899, ch. 701, § 1; P.L. 1900, ch. 784, § 1; C.P.A. 1905, § 1130; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 51; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 42; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 42; impl. am. P.L. 1949, ch. 2174, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-8-9

; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 11.

39-8-10.
Failure to maintain flagperson or precautionary appliances.

Every railroad corporation that shall refuse or neglect to comply with an order, or with a confirmation of such order upon appeal, shall, for every day’s neglect after seven (7) days from the date of the service of the order upon the president, treasurer, or any director of the corporation, forfeit five hundred dollars ($500), one-half (1/2) thereof to the use of the state, and one-half (1/2) thereof to the use of the city or town where the crossing is located.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 48; P.L. 1899, ch. 701, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 52; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 43; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 43; G.L. 1956, §

39-8-10

.

39-8-11.
Order to maintain electric signals at crossing.

At any point where a highway, city or town way, or traveled place is crossed at the same level by a railroad where a gate or flagperson is not maintained, the commission may, after notice to and hearing of the railroad corporation whose road so crosses, direct that the crossing shall be furnished with electric signal or signals as they shall decide the better security of human life or the convenience of the public travel requires, and the corporation shall comply with the order. If the railroad corporation shall refuse or neglect to comply with the order within three (3) months from the date thereof, it shall be fined twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each day that the refusal or neglect shall continue unless it shall furnish reasons satisfactory to the commission for the refusal or neglect. Nothing in this section shall be so construed as to affect §§

39-8-9

and

39-8-10

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 52; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 56; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 47; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 47; G.L. 1956, §

39-8-11

; P.L. 1973, ch. 199, § 6.

39-8-12.
Municipal order to maintain crossing gates or fence.

Every railroad corporation whose railroad crosses any street or highway at grade in the city of Providence shall erect, maintain, and cause to be operated gates across every street or highway satisfactory in all respects to the city council upon receiving notice from the city council, and shall also fence its line of track within the limits of the city in such manner and at such places as the city council may direct. Any railroad corporation violating any of the provisions of this section shall, for every day’s neglect after twenty (20) days from notice or direction to the president, treasurer, or any director of the corporation from the city council as aforesaid to comply with the provisions of this section or with the order or direction of the city council, be fined fifty dollars ($50.00), one-half (1/2) thereof to the use of the state and the other one-half (1/2) to the use of the complainant.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 46; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 50; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 41; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 41; G.L. 1956, §

39-8-12

.

39-8-13.
Erection of warning signs along highway.

Every railroad corporation shall cause to be erected and to be maintained at every turnpike, highway, or public way, where it is crossed by the railroad upon the same level therewith, a suitable sign board upon each side of the crossing; and on each side of the sign boards shall be painted in black capital letters of at least the length of nine inches (9") such words or phrases as may, in the opinion of the division of public utilities and carriers, constitute a proper warning to both pedestrian and vehicular traffic using the crossing. The sign board shall be of such design as may be ordered by the division and shall be placed under the direction and with the consent of the division. The sign board shall indicate whether the railroad crossing is a public or private crossing. Every railroad corporation shall also adopt such other precautionary measures at such grade crossings as shall be deemed proper by the division.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

39-8-13

; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 11.

39-8-14.
Warning bells.

Every railroad corporation shall cause a bell of at least thirty-two pounds (32 lbs.) in weight to be placed on each locomotive engine passing upon its road, and the bell shall be rung at a distance of at least eighty (80) rods from the place where the railroad crosses any turnpike, highway, or public way upon the same grade with the railroad, and shall be kept ringing until the engine has crossed the turnpike or road. No car or carriage for the transportation of passengers or freight over any railroad in this state shall be propelled across any highway, after the locomotive has been detached therefrom, unless a bell is rung or a whistle sounded at the crossing during the whole time the train is crossing the highway.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

39-8-14

.

39-8-15.
Failure to erect signs or ring bell.

Every railroad corporation that shall neglect or refuse to comply with the provisions of §§

39-8-13

and

39-8-14

shall be fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000); and the corporation shall be liable for all damages sustained by any person by reason of neglect or refusal on the part of the corporation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 13; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

39-8-15

.

39-8-16.
Closing of gates at private way.

Whoever enters upon or crosses a railroad at any private way that is closed by gates or bars and neglects to close them securely, shall be fined not less than two dollars ($2.00) nor more than ten dollars ($10.00) and shall be liable for the damage sustained therefrom.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 28; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 32; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

39-8-16

.

39-8-17.
Bail to certain railroad employees.

Whenever a person employed as an engineer, fireperson, conductor, brake person, flagperson, or other crew member, is arrested in any city or town on a criminal charge arising from an accident in connection with the operation of a train, resulting in an injury or death to a person or injury to property, and if as a result of the accident the engineer, fireperson, conductor, brake person, flagperson, or other crew member is required to submit to a hearing before any magistrate, judge, or clerk of court, wherein the engineer, fireperson, conductor, brake person, flagperson, or other crew member is required to furnish bail, then it shall be the obligation and responsibility of the employer of the engineer, fireperson, conductor, brake person, flagperson, or other crew member to furnish bail, and if the employer fails to furnish bail so that the employee as aforesaid is required to furnish bail at his or her own expense, then in that event the employer shall be liable to the employee for all costs incurred in obtaining bail, together with and including counsel fees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 98, § 1.

39-8-18.
Fences along right of way.

Every railroad corporation or company shall erect and thereafter maintain a fence or fences along the boundary lines of its rights of way that are actually used for rail transportation of any kind whenever the public utilities commission shall determine it to be necessary for the public safety and welfare. The commissioner may prescribe the height, length, materials, and design of the fence or fences.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 129, § 1.